Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1855.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 683.24a of Title 63, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The State of Oklahoma Office of Emergency Management shall
contract with a vendor to design and develop a statewide Stormwater
Management Predictive Analytic Solution. The Stormwater Management
Predictive Analytic Solution shall include an early warning
detection system and advanced flood monitoring solution. The
Stormwater Management Predictive Analytic Solution shall access and
visualize all relevant data; forecast future conditions; improve
forecasting models; provide real-time tracking and alerts, and

Req. No. 11397 Page 1

impr ove situational awareness, flood resiliency, and stormwater
management systems.
B. The Stormwater Management Predictive Analytic Solution shall
be operational no later than February 28, 2026. By March 31, 2026,
and annually thereafter, the Office of Emergency Management shall
submit a report to the Governor, Speaker of the Oklahoma House of
Representatives, and the President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma State
Senate summarizing the information from the Stormwater Management
Predictive Analytic Solution and analyzing trends in that
information across years of data collection.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11397 MAH 01/12/25











Req. No. 11397 Page 2